North Carolina, session 2025, HB504.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund for each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium the nonrecurring sum of four hundred seventy-four thousand six
hundred eighty dollars ($474,680) to Mecklenburg County to be allocated to the entities and in
the amounts listed in this section. The purpose of the funding is a pilot program co-responder
model designed to integrate mental health professionals with law enforcement responding to
mental health related calls by people in distress needing assistance. The funds shall be used to
hire and integrate within the law enforcement agency of each locality identified below one
full-time mental health professional to be paired with law enforcement, either on a dedicated
team or as part of a specialized unit, in responding to calls and incidences identified as involving
mental health crises or persons with mental health issues. Funds appropriated in this section are
allocated annually as follows for purposes consistent with this act:
(1) One hundred thirty-one thousand two hundred eighty dollars ($131,280) to the
Town of Matthews.
(2) One hundred seventy-one thousand seven hundred dollars ($171,700) to the
Town of Pineville.
(3) One hundred seventy-one thousand seven hundred dollars ($171,700) to the
Town of Mint Hill.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H504-v-1*